Utah statutes.
16-17-207.   Change of name or address by noncommercial registered agent.

(1)  If a noncommercial registered agent changes its name or its address as currently in effect with respect to a represented entity pursuant to Subsection 16-17-203(1), the agent shall file with the division, with respect to each entity represented by the agent, a statement of change signed by or on behalf of the agent which states:

(a)  the name of the entity;

(b)  the name and address of the agent as currently in effect with respect to the entity;

(c)  if the name of the agent has changed, its new name; and

(d)  if the address of the agent has changed, the new address.

(2)  A statement of change filed under this section takes effect on filing.

(3)  A noncommercial registered agent shall promptly furnish the represented entity with notice in a record of the filing of a statement of change and the changes made by the filing.



Enacted by Chapter 364, 2008 General Session

